test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-vyelgid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vyelgiđ: # MLO, checked
    vyelgiđ+V+Inf: vyelgiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: vuolguđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolguum
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálgoo
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuálgojeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuálgojim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuolgui
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuálgojii
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuolguu

  Verb - pyehtiđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    pyehtiđ+V+Inf: pyehtiđ
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puohtuum
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáhtoo
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: puáhtojeen
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: puohtuv
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: puohtup
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puáhtojeh
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puáhtojim
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puohtui
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puohtuu
    pyehtiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: puohtum
